Washington statutes.
RCW 35.57.080

Purchases and sales—Procedures.

In addition to provisions contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, the public facilities district is authorized to follow procedures contained in chapter 39.26 RCW for all purchases, contracts for purchase, and sales.

[ 2015 c 79 s 2; 1999 c 165 s 8.]